internal_storage/hyphen_dictionaries/hyph_la_classical_ec.dic
u2d1o3p
ud4or
u3d2ós
u3dú
u2e
ue2a
ue3b2
ue3d2
u2e2e
2ue1f
4uel.
ue1l
2ue2l1n
2ue2l1q
2uelu
2uelú
2ue2l1v2
ue2ma
ue1m
ue2má
ue4m1ui
u2emu
ue4m3uí
ue4n3e2a
u2en
ue1ne
ue4n3e2á
ue4n3eo
ue4n3e2ó
ue4n3ii
ue1ni
ue4n3ií
ue4n3íi
ue1ní
2ue2n1n2
ue2o
ue3r4a
ue3r2æ3
ue3r4e
ue5re1m
ue2r3e5me
ue4r3e5mé
uer6e5m2i
uere5mí
ue3ri
ue3r4o1
3ue2r1t
ue3ru
ues3c
ue4s3p2
ues5p2e
u2e2s1q
ue4s3t
ues5t2e
ue2s1u
uete5re
u2e1t
ue3t2e
uete5ri
uet2e2r3i5u
u1e2un
ue1u
u2e2us
2u2e1v
ue3x2
u2é
1ué1c
2ué1f
1ué1h
u2é1i
1u2é1l
ué4n3eo
u2én
ué1ne
3ué1ni
ué4n3ii
2ué2n1n2
2u2éra
ué1r
2uéro1
3ué2r1s2
3ué2r1t
ués3
3ués1p2
2u2é1v
1ué1x
2u1g
u3g2a
u3g2æ3
u3g2l
u2g3n2
u3hœ1
u1h
u3hy
u3hý
ui2a
u2i1c
ui4c5é2n1n2
u2ic2én
uic2é
1u2i1f
u2i3l2e3
ui1l
uil2é3i
u2i3lé
u2i1n
ui3o1c
uio1
ui3o2p
ui3ó1p
ui3p2t2
ui1p
ui3r4i
ui3rí
3u2is1c
u2i3s2i
uiu2
ui3u1l
ui3u1u
2ui1v
1uí1c
1u2í1f
1uí1g
uí1m
3uí2n1c
uí1n
uí3o2p
u2í2o1
uí3p2t2
u2í1p
3u2í1sa
3u2í1s2æ1
3u2í1se
3u2í1s2i
3u2í1s2o
3uí1su.
uís1u
3uí1s2um
3uí1s2us
uí3tu1r
uí2tu
uí1t
3u2íua
uí1u2
3uíu2en
uíu2e
3uíue1q
3uíues
3uíu2e1t
3uíue1u
3u2í1u2o
3u2íu1u
1u2í1x
u3lae1
u1l
ul2a
2u3læ1
u3l2e2e
ul2e
u3l2e2i
u3l2eí
u3l2en
u3leo
u3le2ó
u3leú
3u2l2i1x2
ul2i
3u2l2í1x
3u2l1m2
ul3ua
ul3u2á
ul3uæ1
u4l3ue.
ulu2e
ul3uó
2um.
2uma
u3ma.
um1a2g
u3m2an
u3m2a3q
uma4t2r2
u1m2a1t
u3m2a1u
u3m2a3v
2u1má
umá2g
u3m2án
u3m2á1q
u3m2á1r
u3m2á1u
u3m2á1v
u3m2æ1
u2m3b2
umb4e
umb4i
um5bi1t
um4b3i5t2i
umb6itu
um4b5i5tu1r
umb3i5tú
umbí5t2e
umb1í
umbí2t
2u1me
u3me.
ume3d2
ume5de
um1e2g
um1e2q
u3m2e1v
umé2g
u1mé
umi2b2
u1mi
umi2c
uminí4c
umi1n
umi1ní
umi2r
umi2u
umi2v
umí2b
u1mí
umíni4c
umí1n
umí1ni
umí2r
2u2m1n2
2umo
u3mo.
u3m2on
u3m2o1q
u3m2or
u3m2o1u2
u3m2o1v
2u1mó
u3m2ó1n
u3m2ó1q
u3m2ór
u3m2ó1u2
u3m2ó1v
2u2m1q
2umu
u4m1u2e
um3uí
u3m2us
u3m2ús
u1mú
2u2m1v
un3a1ní
u1na
una2n
un3á2ni
u1ná
un2án
u2n3d2
3undá1b
und2á
5u2n1dá2n1d
und2án
5undá2ns
5und2á3r2a
undá1r
5und2áro1
5undárun
und2áru
5und2á2s1s2
5und2ás1t
5undáuer
undá1u
und2áu2e
5undáui
5undáver
und2á1v
undáve1
5undáv2i
u1n2e
un4e3b2
une3d2
une6s5t2e
unes1t
u1n2é
un2é3b2
u3n2os
u1no
u3n2ós
u1nó
u2n3s
un1s2i
un4s1n
un4s1q
un4su2e
uns1u
un4s1v
2u2n1t
unte5i2o1
un3t2e
unt2e1i
unte5ió
unte5iu
unte6i3u2e
unt2é3i
u1n2u
1u2o
u1o1b2
u2o2du
uo1d
uo3iæ1
uo1i2
uo3io1
uo3ió
uo2i3q
uo4i1u2e
uo2i1v
uo4lu2e
uo1l
uol5ue3r4e
uo4lui
uol5ui1t
uo4luí
uo2m3p2
u2o3ni
uo4n3i2a
uo3p2
u2os3t
uos5t2e
u2o3u2
uo1ú2
uó2du
u2ó1d
uó3iæ1
uó1i2
uó3io1
1uó1l
uó2m3p2
uó4n3i2a
uó1n
uó1ni
uó3p2
2u1p
up2e2
upe5rae3q
upe1ra
upe2r3ae1
upe5ran
upe5rar2a
upera1r
upe5ra1r2á
upe5ra1r2e
upe5ra1ré
upe5raro1
upe5ra1ró
uper5as6c
upe5ráe
upe1rá
upe5rá1r
upe5ræ1q
uper1æ2
up2er5e2á
upe1re
upe5r2e2m1n2
upere1m
up2er5e2o
up2er5e2ó
uper5e6ra
uper5e6rá
uper5e6ri1m
upere3ri
uper5e6ri1t
uper5e6rí1t
uper2e1rí
uper3e6ro1
uper5e6ró
upere6ru
uper5erun
uper5e6rú
uper5es1c
upere4s
upe5r2é2m1n2
up2e1ré
uper5é6ri1m
uperé1r
uper5é6ri1t
uper5és1c
uperé4s
upe1ri4
up2e4r5ie
up2er5ié
uper5ir
uper5it2o
uperi1t
uper5itó
uper5itú
uper5í1m2i
up2e1rí
uper5í4r
uper5ít2e
uperí1t
uper5ít2o
upe5r3o2r1n2
upero1
upe5ro4s
upe5ró2r1n2
upe1ró
upe5ró4s
uper5uí
upe5rus
u3pé
upé4r5ea
upé1r
up2é1re
upé4r5e1o
upé4r5e4r
upé4ri.
up2é4r5ie
upo4s3
up2o
upr6e5m2i
up2r2
upr4e1m
up1re
2u1q
u3q2u2
u1r
2ur.
ur2a
u3ra.
ura1d2
u3rae1
u3r4a3ne
u3ra1q
u3r2a3rú
ura1r
u3ra1u
u3r2a1v
u3ráe
u1rá
u3rá1ne
ur2án
u3r2á1q
u3rá1u
u3r2á1v
2u3ræ1
u1r2e
u2re3d
ur2e2i2
ure5iae1
ure2i2a
ure5iam
ure5ia1r
ure5i2as
ure5iáe
ure2iá
ure5iám
ure5i2á1q
ure5iá1r
ure5iás
ure5iá1u
ure5i2á1v
ure3iæ1
ure5ium
ure2iu
ure3iú
ures3t
u1r2é
u3r1é1f
ur2i
u3ri2a
u3riá
u3r2iæ1
u3rii
u3r4ií
ur4i1n
2u3ri2o1
2u3rió
u3r2ía
u1rí
2u3r2í2o1
u1rí5tu1r
urí2tu
urí1t
2u2r1n2
2ur2o1
urob2o3
ur1o1b1
4u3ro1d
ur4or
uro2s
u3rós
u1ró
2u2r1q
ur5ri1m
u2r1r2
ur3ua
ur3u2á
ur3uém
uru2é
ur3u2én
ur3ués3
ur3u2é1t
ur2ui
u3rum
ur3uó
u3rus
u3rúm1
u1rú
u3rús
2us.
us3á4t2r2
u1sá
usá1t
2us3c
us2e2i
u1se
2u1s2é
u1s2i
2us1m2
2u2s1n
u1s1p2
us5per
usp2e
us4pi1t
usp2i
us4pí1r
us4pí1t
2us3q
us3t
us5ter
ust2e
u3s4tom2
ust2o
u3s4tóm
u2s5tro1
ust2r2
u1s4ty
u1s4tý
us2ua
us1u
4usu2e
u2s2ui
u2s2uí
2u2s1v
1ut.
u1t
u4t2ar.
ut2a
uta1r
u4t2a2r1n2
u4t2a2r1q
u4t2a2r1v
u4t2á2r1n2
utá1r
u4t2á2r1q
u4t2á2r1v
u2te1b2
ut2e
4ute3r4a
4ute1rá
4uter1æ2
ute5re
4ute5ri
uteri5u2e
ut2e2r3i4u
ut2e4r3i5v
4ute3ro1
4ute1ró
4ut2e3ru2m3
ute5rus
4ute1rú
u2t2é1b2
4ut2éra
uté1r
2ut2h
2u3tia
ut2i
2u3ti2á
2u3t2iæ1
2u3tii
2u3tií
u2ti1l
2u3tio1
u2t2í1l
2ut2l
3utra
ut2r2
u2t1rá
3u2træ1
ut4ri
3u2tru
u2t1rú
ut2u
u3t3u1t
u1u
2u3u2e
1u2u1l
uul3ui
uul3uí
u2um1
u2un
u2u1r
u2us
u2u1u
u2u1v
1uú1l
uú2l3u
uú1r
2u3ve1
u1v
u1x2
uxi3n4
u2x1o3
ux1u3
u2x3u2e
uy2s
úbe4ram
ú1b
úbe1r4a
úb4eris
úbe1r4i
úbe4ri1t
úb4ii.
ú3b4iis
ú3b2i2u
úbi3ui
úb1i3v
ú2b3s2
úb5st2e
úbs1t
ú3b2u
2ú1c
ú2c3u2e
úc2u
úd2i
ú1d
úe1
úe2a
úe2o
ú3g2a
ú1g
ú3g1æ2
ú2g3n2
ú3iæ1
ú1ii
ú2i1n
ú2la.
ú1l
úl2a
ú2la1t
ú2l2e1t
úl2e
ú2lu
úl3ua
úl3uæ1
úl3u2e
úl3uis
ú3l2um
úm1
ú1ma
úm1a2g
ú3m2an
ú3m2a3q
úma2r
ú3m2a1u
ú3m2a3v
ú2m3b2
úmb4e
úmb4i
úm5bi5t
úmb6itu
ú1m2e
úmi2c
ú1mi
úm2i1m
úm2i1n
úm2iu
2ú2m1n2
ú1mo
2ú2m1q
2úmu
ú3mun
2ú2m1v
5únd2a2ns1
ú2n1d
2ú1ni
ún3si
ú2ns
2ú2n1t
ú1n2u
úpe3r
ú1p
úp2e
2ú1q
ú1ra
2ú1ræ1
ú1r2e
ú1ri
ú3ri2a
ú3r2iæ1
ú3rii
2ú2r1n2
ú1ro1
2ú2r1q
úr3ua
ú3r2ui
ú1ru3m
ú2run
ú3rus
ús3c
ú1s2i
2ú2s1n
ús3q
ús3t
4úsu2e
ús1u
ú2s2ui
2ú2s1v
ú2ta1r
ú1t
út2a
úte3r
út2e
2ú3tia
út2i
2ú3t2iæ1
2ú3tii
ú2ti1l
ú1u
2úu2e
ú2um
ú2un
ú2us
2úve1
ú1v
2ú1x
úx2a
úx2o2
ú2xu2e
úx1u2
1v
va3d2
vad4o2
va3g
val4u
va1l
v1as3p2
vas5t2e
v2as1t
v2á
v3áe3d2
vás3p2
2v1æ2d2
væ1
v1b2
vbi2
ve1
ve2a
ve2i2a
v2e1i
ve2iá
ve4ie1ne
vei2en
ve4ie1q
ve4i2e1u
1ve4i2e1v
ve2i2i
ve2ií
ve4io.
vei2o1
ve4i2o1q
ve4ior
ve6ioue.
vei2o1u2
veiou2e
ve6iove.
1vei2o1v
veiove1
ve4ió1n
ve4i2ó1q
ve4iór
ve6ióue.
vei2ó1u2
veióu2e
ve6ióve.
1vei2ó1v
veióve1
ve2iu
ve2iú
v2e2í
ve2lu
ve1l
ve4n3e2a
v2en
ve1ne
ve4n3e2á
ve4n3eo
ve4n3e2ó
ve4n3ii
ve1ni
ve4n3ií
ve4n3íi
ve1ní
2ve2n1n2
ve2o
ve3r4a
ver2æ3
ve3ri
ve2s1c
ve4s3p2
ves5p2e
v2e2s1q
ve4s3t
ves5t2e
vete5re
v2e1t
ve3t2e
vete5ri
1vet2e4r3i5v
ve2u
ve1x2
vé2lu2
v2é1l
vé4n3eo
v2én
vé1ne
vé4n3ii
vé1ni
2vé2n1n2
vés3
v2i
vi2a
vi4c5é2n1n2
v2ic2én
vi1c
vic2é
v2i3d
v2ip2e3
vi1p
vi3r4i
3viu
3viú
v2í1d2
ví3tu
ví1t
2v1j
v1o1b2
vo3lu
vo1l
v2os3t
vos5t2e
vó3l2u
vó1l
vr2a
vri2
1x
x1a
xae2
x2ae3q
xaes3
x2ae1u
x2a2e1v
x2a1g
2xa1l
xam4b3i4
x1a2m1b
xam4b1í4
x2an
x2a1q
x2a1r2e
xa1r
x2a1t
xáes3
x2áe1u
x2á2e1v
x2á1g
2xá1l
xám4b3i
x1á2m1b
x2á1t
x1æ2
x2æ3q
xæs3
x2æ3u2
x2æ3v
2x1c2
xcí3
xe1
xe2a
x2e1b2
x2e1d
x2e2e
xe4ger
xe1g
xeg2e
xe4gé1r
xe2g2i
xe2gí
x2e2i
x2e2í
x2e1m2i
xe1m
x3e2n1n2
x2en
xe2o
xe4qui
xe1q
xeq2u2
x2e1ra
x2e1rá
x2e1re
x2e1ri
x2ero1
x2e1ró
x2eru
x2e1rú
x2e2s
xe2u
3x2e3u2e
xe2ú
x2é
x3é2g
x3é2m1p
x3é2n1n2
x2én
xé4qui
xé1q
xéq2u2
x3é2r1c
xé1r
2x1h
xi2b2
2xie
3x2ie2s
2x1i2g
xi2i
x2i1m
xi2n
xi1n3a
xi3ni
xi3ní
x2i3nú
x2i1q
2xi2r
x2i2s1s2
xi2t2æ1
xi1t
x2i2t1n
x2i2t1q
xi2tu
x2i2t1v
xi4uer
xi1u2e
xi4ué1r
xi1u2é
2xi2ui
xi2uí
x2i3u1u
xi4ver
xi1v
xive1
xi4vé1r
2xi2v2i
xi2ví
2xí2b
2xí2g
2xí2mu
x2í1n
x2í1q
2xí2r
x2ís
xí2t2a
xí1t
xí4te.
xít2e
2xí2t2i
x2í2t1n
2xí2t2o
x2í2t1q
x2í2t1v
xí4uer
xí1u2
xíu2e
xí4ui1m
xí4ui1t
xí4ver
xí1v
xíve1
xí4vi1m
xív2i
xí4vi1t
2x1j
x2l2
2x1n
x3ne
x1o2
3xo.
x2o3d
3xon
3x2o1q
xorí3t
xo1rí
xo4r1n2
x2o4r1q
x2o3ru
x2o4r1v
3xos
x2o4s1n
x2o4s1q
xo4s1u
x2o4s1v
x2o3t
3x2o3u2
3x2o3v
xó4ner
xó1n
xó1ne
xó4ra1t
xó1ra
xó4rer
xó1re
xó4r2e1t
xó4ror
xó1ro1
xó2s
x2ó1t
2x1p
xpe2r
xp2e
2x1q
x3q2u2
2x1s2
xs4p2e
xs1p2
xsu4lu
xs1u
x1s2u1l
xsup2e3
x3s2u1p
2x1t
x3t2a
x3tá
x3t2æ1
x3t2e
xte3r4a
xte5re
xte5ri
xteri5u2e
xt2e2r3i4u
xt2e4r3i5v
xte3ro1
xte5rus
x3t2i1
x3tí
x3t2o
x3tó
x3t2r2
xtr6e5m2i
xtr4e1m
xt1re
x3tu
x3tú
x1u2
3xu.
2x3ue.
xu2e
x3u2e1v
xu4l2e
xu1l
3x2um
x2u1m2e
x2u4m1n2
x2u4m1q
x2u4m1v
x2u1n2e
x2u3r2o1
xu1r
3xus
x2u4s1n
x2u4s3q
x2u4s1u
x2u4s1v
x2u2um1
xu1u
x2uúm1
xú2b
xú2l
x2úm1
x2ú1ne
xú1r
x2ús3q
x2ús1u
xú2t
xú2ui
xú1u
xú2v2i
xú1v
2x1v
x3ve1
1x2x2
ya1d2
y2a2n2u
yá2nu
y2án
y1b2
ybe2
y1d2
yda3m
yde2s
ye2
yes3
yé2
yés3
y2g3n2
y1g
ygo3
y2i
yi2i
yi1n2
y2io2s
yio1
yis3
yl3ui
y1l
yl3uí
y1m
y1m2e
yme3d2
yme5de
y1n
y1ne2
y1n2i
yo3n2e
y2o3ni
yó1
yp2eri5n
y1p
yp2e
ype1ri
y1r
yr2a
y1r2á
yr4or
yro1
yro2s
y1s2i
yst2e3
ys1t
y1s1u
yt2e1
y1t
yte5ri
yteri5u2e
yt2e2r3i4u
yt2e4r3i5v
y2x1u2
y1x
ýa1
ýa1d2
ýda3
ý1d
ý2g3n2
ý1g
ý2i
ý2l1u
ý1l
ý1m
ý1m2e
ý1r
ý1s2i
ýst2e3
ýs1t
ýt2e1
ý1t
ý2t2h
ý2x1u2
ý1x
1z
zá1m
ze3b2
z2i
zma3
zo1
zo2s
